Hawaii statutes.
§662-3 Jurisdiction. The circuit
courts of the State and, except as otherwise provided by statute or rule, the
state district courts shall have original jurisdiction of all tort actions on
claims against the State, for money damages, accruing on and after July 1,
1957, for injury or loss of property, or personal injury or death caused by the
negligent or wrongful act or omission of any employee of the State while acting
within the scope of the employee's office or employment. [L 1957, c 312, pt of
§1; Supp, §245A-3; HRS §662-3; am L 1978, c 156, §2; am L 1984, c 135, §3; am L
2015, c 35, §20]

Case Notes

Nothing in the language of this section and §661-1 suggests
that Hawaii intended to subject itself to suit in federal court. 950 F. Supp.
2d 1159 (2013).

Does not bar U.S. government from bringing claim for
contribution against State in federal court. 643 F. Supp. 593.

Where plaintiffs seek injunction for unconstitutional acts
and damages, sovereign immunity bars suit. 68 H. 192, 708 P.2d 129, cert.
denied, 476 U.S. 1169.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next